Hawaii, session 2026, HB1594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's geographic isolation and rabies-free status necessitate stringent regulation of animal importation to protect public health and safety.  At the same time, the State continues to experience significant challenges associated with pet overpopulation and the adverse impacts of free-roaming animals on animal welfare, community well-being, and native ecosystems. The legislature further finds that the State's animal quarantine program serves as the primary gateway for dogs and cats entering Hawaii and provides an efficient administrative mechanism to promote responsible pet ownership without imposing additional burdens on existing veterinary resources. The purpose of this Act is to decrease the number of fertile, unaltered dogs and cats imported into the State by requiring proof of sterilization prior to embarkation, subject to reasonable exemptions for medical necessity, temporary stays, and registered breeders. SECTION 2.  Chapter 142, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§142-     Proof of sterilization required for importation of dogs and cats.  (a)  As a condition of entry into the State under this part, the department of agriculture and biosecurity shall require submission of documentation verifying that any dog or cat imported into the State has been surgically sterilized, except as provided in subsection (b). (b)  The requirements pursuant to subsection (a) shall not apply if: (1)  The animal is being imported for a period of less than ninety days and will not be sold or transferred, or otherwise remain in the State, beyond the ninety day period; (2)  A licensed veterinarian certifies that sterilization would jeopardize the animal's health or life; or (3)  The owner or importer is registered with the department as a breeder pursuant to subsection (c). (c)  The department shall establish and maintain a breeder registry for individuals or entities importing intact dogs or cats.  The registry shall include, at a minimum, the breeder's name, business address, and species or breeds maintained. (d)  The department may assess reasonable fees to offset the costs of administering this section, including expenses related to verifying documentation and maintaining the breeder registry. (e)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this section.  The rules shall address, at a minimum, documentation requirements, acceptable forms of proof of sterilization, and verification procedures in coordination with airlines and other carriers. (f)  For the purposes of this section, "sterilization" means surgical spaying or neutering performed by a licensed veterinarian." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________